Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-4934
Act; applicability.

The Quality Jobs Act applies to applications filed, board actions taken, and agreements entered into on or after February 1, 1995.

Laws 1995, LB 829, § 34.